Washington statutes.
RCW 36.58.120

Solid waste disposal district—Establishment—Ordinance.

No solid waste disposal district shall be established within a county unless the county legislative authority determines, following a hearing held pursuant to RCW 36.58.110, that it is in the public interest to form the district and the county legislative authority adopts an ordinance creating the solid waste disposal district and establishing its boundaries.

[ 1982 c 175 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 175: See note following RCW 36.58.100.